Massachusetts, session 194th, H435.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 25E 3/4 the following section:-
Section 25E 7/8. (a) For purposes of this section, a “successor supplier” shall mean any
person who acquires, in any manner whatsoever, whether directly or indirectly, the right or
obligation to sell an item with brand name to a wholesaler licensed in the commonwealth.
(b) Any successor supplier acquiring a right or obligation to sell to a wholesaler does so
subject to the agreement between the wholesaler and the supplier existing at the time of
succession.
An agreement with a licensed wholesaler includes, without limitation, a commercial
relationship of a definite or indefinite duration between a wholesaler and the person selling a
brand item to such wholesaler, whether oral or in writing, or any relationship whereby the
of 2

licensed wholesaler is granted the right to offer and sell items with brand names within the
commonwealth.
All sales of a brand name item made to a licensed wholesaler prior to succession shall be
attributed to the successor supplier for the purpose of determining whether six months of regular
sales exist, pursuant to section 25E.
The provisions of section 25E, prohibiting a supplier from refusing the sell an item
having a brand name, shall further be binding on any successor supplier.
(c) This section shall be liberally construed to effectuate the remedial purpose of the
protections set forth in section 25E.
of 2